Utah statutes.
67-1-1.   General powers and duties.
In addition to those prescribed by the constitution, the governor has the
following powers and must perform the following duties:
(1)  He shall supervise the official conduct of all executive and ministerial
officers.
(2)  He shall see that all offices are filled and the duties thereof
performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows, and, if
the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the Legislature therewith at its next
session.
(3)  He shall make appointments and fill vacancies as required by law.
(4)  He is the sole official organ of communication between the government of
this state and the government of any other state and of the United States.
(5)  Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this state, or
which may affect the title of this state to any property, or which may result
in any claim against the state, he may direct the attorney general to appear
on behalf of the state, and may employ such additional counsel as he may judge
expedient.
(6)  He may require the attorney general or the county attorney or district
attorney of any county to inquire into the affairs or management of any
corporation doing business in this state.
(7)  He may require the attorney general to aid any county attorney or
district attorney in the discharge of his duties.
(8)  He may offer rewards, not exceeding $1,000 each, payable out of the
general fund, for the apprehension of any convict who has escaped from the
state prison, or any person who has committed, or is charged with the
commission of, a felony.
(9)  He must perform such duties respecting fugitives from justice as are
prescribed by law.
(10)  He must issue and transmit election proclamations as prescribed by law.
(11)  He must issue land warrants and patents as prescribed by law.
(12)  He must, prior to each regular meeting of the Legislature, deliver to
the Division of Archives for publication all biennial reports of officers,
commissions, and boards for the two preceding years.
(13)  He may require any officer, commission, or board to make special reports
to him in writing.
(14)  He must discharge the duties of a member of all boards of which he is or
may be made a member by the constitution or by law.
(15)  He shall each year issue a proclamation recommending the observance of
Arbor day, by the planting of trees, shrubs, and vines, in the promotion of
forest growth and culture, and in the adornment of public and private grounds,
places and ways, and in such other efforts and undertakings as shall be in
harmony with the general character of such holiday.
(16)  He has such other powers and must perform such other duties as are
devolved upon him by law.
